District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-301.05d

Council review of proposals to contract out in excess of $1,000,000.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 105d
as added Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 501(b), 43 DCR 5
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.5d.